Massachusetts, session 194th, H2257.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, there shall
be a special legislative commission established pursuant to section 2A of chapter 4 of the
General Laws to conduct a study of municipal bonding.
The commission shall consist of eleven members, two of whom shall be the chairs of the
joint committee on municipalities and regional government or their designees, who shall serve as
co-chairs; one of whom shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives who
shall have expertise in municipal finance; one of whom shall be appointed by the president of the
senate who shall have expertise in bonding law or bonding credit rating practices; one of whom
shall be the minority leader of the House or their designee; one of whom shall be the minority
leader of the Senate or their designee; one of whom shall be the senior deputy commissioner of
the division of local services within the department of revenue or their designee; one of whom
shall be a chief financial officer of a city within the commonwealth, to be appointed by the
of 3

Massachusetts Municipal Association; one of whom shall be a chief financial officer of a town
within the commonwealth, to be appointed by the Massachusetts Municipal Association; one of
whom shall be the treasurer and receiver general of the Commonwealth or their designee; one of
whom shall be the secretary of administration and finance of the commonwealth or their
designee.
The commission shall evaluate municipal bond issuance practices in the commonwealth
and across the United States and make recommendations to the legislature regarding the manner
in which municipalities can maximize their bond rating. The commission shall:
(i) Survey the credit ratings of bond issuing municipalities over time;
(ii) Compare how Massachusetts municipalities have been impacted by their respective
bond ratings and how this experience compares to that of similar municipalities in other states;
(iii) Compile bond credit rating presentations and identify best practices in effectiveness;
(iv) Investigate and report on methodologies used by municipal bond credit rating
agencies;
(v) Identify best practices in municipal finance and what common barriers exist, if any, in
adopting them; and
(vi) Determine how statewide organizations and the division of local services may offer
technical assistance throughout the municipal bonding process.
(b) The Department of Revenue and each municipality of the commonwealth shall, upon
request of the commission, provide to the commission timely access to all records and
documents as the commission may require pursuant to its charge.
of 3

(c) The commission shall convene within forty days of a quorum of 5 members having
been appointed and shall submit its findings and recommendations, including any proposed
legislation relative to municipal bonding practices, by filing the same with the clerks of the house
of representatives and senate and the governor not later than September 31, 2025.
of 3